Virginia statutes. Title 64.2. Wills, Trusts, and Fiduciaries.
Article 2. List of Heirs and Affidavit of Real Estate.

§ 64.2-509.
List of heirs.

Every personal representative of a decedent, whether the decedent died testate or intestate, shall, at the time of his qualification, and every proponent of a will where there is no qualification of a personal representative, shall, at the time the will is presented for probate, furnish a list of heirs under oath in accordance with a form provided to each clerk of court by the Office of the Executive Secretary of the Supreme Court or a computer-generated facsimile thereof to the court or clerk where the personal representative qualifies and to the clerk of the circuit court for the jurisdiction where any real estate that is part of the decedent’s estate is located.

If there has been no qualification of a personal representative within 30 days following the decedent’s death, a list of heirs, made under oath in accordance with the form provided to each clerk or a computer-generated facsimile thereof, may be filed by any heir at law of a decedent who died intestate.

The clerk shall record the list of heirs in the will book and index the list in the name of the decedent and the heirs. A list of heirs made under oath and recorded pursuant to this section shall be prima facie evidence of the facts contained in the list. The cost of recording the list shall be deemed a part of the cost of administration and be paid out of the estate of the decedent.

The personal representative shall not receive any compensation for his services until the list of heirs is filed unless he files an affidavit before the commissioner of accounts that the heirs are unknown to him and that after diligent inquiry he has been unable to ascertain their names, ages, or addresses, as the case may be.

The list of heirs filed pursuant to this section shall reflect the heirs in existence on the date of the decedent’s death. If there are any changes as to who should be included on the list of heirs, an additional list of heirs shall be filed that includes such changes.

History.

Code 1950, § 64-127; 1954, c. 182; 1968, cc. 384, 656, § 64.1-134; 1984, c. 339; 1994, c. 327; 1998, c. 610; 2010, c. 585; 2012, c. 614.

Law Review.

For note, “Constitutionality of Notice in Virginia Probate and Estate Administration,” see 42 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 1325 (1985).

For 1994 survey of Virginia wills, trusts, and estates law, see 28 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1145 (1994).

For an article relating to developments in the law of wills, trusts and estates in 1998, see 32 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1405 (1998).

For article, “Medical Malpractice Law,” see 45 U. Rich. L. Rev. 319 (2010).

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 15-401 Checklist for Probate and Administration, et seq.; No. 16-2003 List of Heirs/Real Estate Affidavit.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

8A M.J. Executors and Administrators, § 82.

§ 64.2-510.
Affidavit relating to real estate of intestate decedent.

Any person having an interest in real estate that is part of an intestate decedent’s estate, including a personal representative who has qualified, may execute an affidavit, on a form provided to each clerk of the court by the Office of the Executive Secretary of the Supreme Court or a computer-generated facsimile thereof, setting forth briefly (i) a description of the real estate owned by the decedent at the time of his death situated within the jurisdiction where the affidavit is to be recorded; (ii) that the decedent died intestate; and (iii) the names and last known addresses of the decedent’s heirs at law. The clerk of the circuit court of the jurisdiction where such real estate or any part thereof is located shall record and index the affidavit as wills are recorded and indexed in the name of the decedent and the heirs.

The clerk of the circuit court of the jurisdiction where the affidavit is recorded shall transmit an abstract of the affidavit to the commissioner of the revenue of such jurisdiction. In lieu of a printed paper copy of such abstract, the clerk may provide an electronic abstract or secure remote electronic access to such abstract to the commissioner. Upon receipt of the affidavit, the commissioner may transfer the real estate upon the land books and assess the real estate in accordance therewith.

History.

Code 1950, § 64-127.1; 1952, c. 149; 1968, c. 656, § 64.1-135; 1998, c. 610; 2012, c. 614; 2017, c. 42.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 42 inserted the second sentence in subsection B.

Law Review.

For an article relating to developments in the law of wills, trusts and estates in 1998, see 32 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1405 (1998).